Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1718.01
Seller-assisted marketing plan; sales under five hundred dollars; exemption from act; conditions.

A seller-assisted marketing plan shall not include the sale of a business opportunity for which the immediate cash payment made by the purchaser does not exceed five hundred dollars and the payment is made for the not-for-profit sale of sales demonstration equipment, material, or samples for use in making sales and not for resale or the payment is made for product inventory sold to the purchaser at a bona fide wholesale price.

Laws 1993, LB 218, § 8.